Illinois, session 104th, HB2495.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 1. Short title. 5    (a) This Act may be cited as the Private Swimming Pool 6Enclosure Act.7    (b) This Act may be referred to as "Zoe's Law". 8    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "swimming 9pool" means an outdoor artificial basin of water that is 10constructed, modified, improved, or installed in or above the 11ground of private residential property for the purpose of 12swimming or wading and that has a depth of more than 24 inches 13covering more than 25 square feet or that has a capacity of 14more than 200 gallons of water. "Swimming pool" includes only 15swimming pools intended for the use of the owner and guests. 16"Swimming pool" does not include (i) swimming pools subject to 17the Swimming Pool and Bathing Beach Act or the Swimming Pool 18Safety Act; (ii) above ground pools with a height of 42 or more 19inches; or (iii) jacuzzis.  20    Section 10. Barrier required. A protective fence, wall, 21or other effective permanent barrier shall completely enclose 22the perimeter of a swimming pool the construction or   HB2495- 2 -LRB104 11289 RTM 21375 b1installation of which is completed on or after the effective 2date of this Act. The fence, wall, or other barrier shall be at 3least 42 inches in height with openings not more than 2 inches 4from the bottom to grade and not more than 4 inches within the 5wall, fence, or barrier.  6    Section 15. Local regulation. 7    (a) Nothing in this Act prohibits a unit of local 8government from regulating the enclosure of swimming pools, 9the construction or installation of which is completed on or 10after the effective date of this Act, in a more restrictive 11manner. Nothing in this Act prohibits a unit of local 12government from regulating the enclosure of swimming pools, 13the construction or installation of which is completed before 14the effective date of this Act, in an inconsistent manner.15    (b) All municipalities shall, by ordinance or resolution, 16develop a permitting process for all swimming pools no later 17than January 1, 2027. All permitted swimming pools shall have 18enclosures inspected by the permitting municipality before the 19receipt of an initial permit and at least once every 5 years 20thereafter.  21    Section 20. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 22the enclosure of swimming pools, the construction or 23installation of which is completed on or after the effective 24date of this Act, in a manner less restrictive than the   HB2495- 3 -LRB104 11289 RTM 21375 b1regulation by the State of the enclosure of those swimming 2pools under this Act. This Section is a limitation under 3subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 4Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 5powers and functions exercised by the State.  6    Section 105. The Counties Code is amended by changing 7Section 5-1066 as follows:  8    (55 ILCS 5/5-1066)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-1066)9    Sec. 5-1066. Artificial basins of water used for swimming 10or wading. Subject to the Private Swimming Pool Enclosure Act, 11the county board may prescribe rules and regulations for the 12construction of privately owned artificial basins of water 13used for swimming or wading, which use or need external 14buttresses or which are dug into the ground, located on 15private residential property and intended for the use of the 16owner and guests. The county shall, however, exempt all 17municipalities located wholly or partly within the county 18where the municipal building code is equal to or of higher 19standard than the county regulation and where the local 20authorities are enforcing the municipal building code. 21(Source: P.A. 86-962.) 22    Section 110. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 23changing Section 11-30-9 as follows:    HB2495- 4 -LRB104 11289 RTM 21375 b1    (65 ILCS 5/11-30-9)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-30-9)2    Sec. 11-30-9. Artificial basins of water. Subject to the 3Private Swimming Pool Enclosure Act, the corporate authorities 4may prescribe rules and regulations for the construction of 5privately owned artificial basins of water used for swimming 6or wading, which use or need external buttresses or which are 7dug into the ground, located on private residential property 8and intended for the use of the owner and guests. 9    The corporate authorities may by ordinance require the 10construction of fences around or protective covers over 11previously constructed artificial basins of water dug in the 12ground and used for swimming or wading, which are located on 13private residential property and intended for the use of the 14owner and guests. 15(Source: P.A. 86-1470.)